Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2445.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 HOUSING BUDGET APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agency for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin HOUSING FINANCE AGENCYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 158,698,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 83,248,000 new text end new text begin (a) The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin (b) Unless otherwise specified, the appropriations for the programs in this section are appropriated and made available for the purposes of the housing development fund. Except as otherwise indicated, the amounts appropriated are part of the agency's permanent budget base. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Challenge Program new text end new text begin 22,925,000 new text end new text begin 12,925,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the economic development and housing challenge program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 462A.33 and 462A.07, subdivision 14. new text end new text begin (b) Of this amount, $1,208,000 each year shall be made available during the first 11 months of the fiscal year exclusively for housing projects for American Indians. Any funds not committed to housing projects for American Indians within the annual consolidated request for funding processes may be available for any eligible activity under Minnesota Statutes, sections 462A.33 and 462A.07, subdivision 14. new text end new text begin (c) The base for this program in fiscal year 2028 and beyond is $12,925,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Workforce Housing Development new text end new text begin 12,000,000 new text end new text begin 2,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the greater Minnesota workforce housing development program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.39. If requested by the applicant and approved by the agency, funded properties may include a portion of income and rent restricted units. Funded properties may include owner-occupied homes. new text end new text begin (b) The base for this program in fiscal year 2028 and beyond is $2,000,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Manufactured Home Park Infrastructure Grants new text end new text begin 3,000,000 new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for manufactured home park infrastructure grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.2035, subdivision 1b. new text end new text begin (b) The base for this program in fiscal year 2028 and beyond is $1,000,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Workforce Homeownership Program new text end new text begin 3,250,000 new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the workforce homeownership program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.38. new text end new text begin (b) The base for this program in fiscal year 2028 and beyond is $250,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Rent Assistance Program new text end new text begin 23,000,000 new text end new text begin 23,000,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is for the rent assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.2095. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Housing Trust Fund new text end new text begin 11,646,000 new text end new text begin 11,646,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is for deposit in the housing trust fund account created under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.201, and may be used for the purposes provided in that section. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Homework Starts with Home new text end new text begin 2,750,000 new text end new text begin 2,750,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is for the homework starts with home program under Minnesota Statutes, sections 462A.201, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (4), and 462A.204, subdivision 8, to provide assistance to homeless families, those at risk of homelessness, or highly mobile families. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Rental Assistance for Mentally Ill new text end new text begin 5,338,000 new text end new text begin 5,338,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the rental housing assistance program for persons with a mental illness or families with an adult member with a mental illness under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.2097. Among comparable proposals, the agency shall prioritize those proposals that target, in part, eligible persons who desire to move to more integrated, community-based settings. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for risk mitigation funds, landlord incentives, or other costs necessary to decrease the risk of homelessness, as determined by the agency. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Family Homeless Prevention new text end new text begin 40,419,000 new text end new text begin 10,719,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the family homeless prevention and assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.204. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for program costs necessary to decrease the risk of homelessness and improve the effectiveness of the program, as determined by the agency. new text end new text begin (c) When a new grantee works with a current or former grantee in a given geographic area, a new grantee may work with either an advisory committee as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.204, subdivision 6, or the local continuum of care and is not required to meet the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.204, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (d) The base for this program in fiscal year 2028 and beyond is $10,719,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Home Ownership Assistance Fund new text end new text begin 885,000 new text end new text begin 885,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is for the home ownership assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.21, subdivision 8. The agency shall continue to strengthen its efforts to address the disparity gap in the homeownership rate between white households and Indigenous American Indians and communities of color. To better understand and address the disparity gap, the agency is required to collect, on a voluntary basis, demographic information regarding race, color, national origin, and sex of applicants for agency programs intended to benefit homeowners and homebuyers. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Affordable Rental Investment Fund new text end new text begin 4,218,000 new text end new text begin 4,218,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the affordable rental investment fund program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.21, subdivision 8b, to finance the acquisition, rehabilitation, and debt restructuring of federally assisted rental property and for making equity take-out loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.05, subdivision 39. new text end new text begin (b) The owner of federally assisted rental property must agree to participate in the applicable federally assisted housing program and to extend any existing low-income affordability restrictions on the housing for the maximum term permitted. new text end new text begin (c) The appropriation also may be used to finance the acquisition, rehabilitation, and debt restructuring of existing supportive housing properties and naturally occurring affordable housing as determined by the commissioner. For purposes of this paragraph, "supportive housing" means affordable rental housing with links to services necessary for individuals, youth, and families with children to maintain housing stability. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Owner-Occupied Housing Rehabilitation new text end new text begin 2,772,000 new text end new text begin 2,772,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the rehabilitation of owner-occupied housing under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.05, subdivisions 14 and 14a. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, grants or loans under this subdivision may be made without rent or income restrictions of owners or tenants. To the extent practicable, grants or loans must be made available statewide. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Rental Housing Rehabilitation new text end new text begin 3,743,000 new text end new text begin 3,743,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the rehabilitation of eligible rental housing under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.05, subdivision 14. In administering a rehabilitation program for rental housing, the agency may apply the processes and priorities adopted for administration of the economic development and housing challenge program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.33, and may provide grants or forgivable loans if approved by the agency. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, grants or loans under this subdivision may be made without rent or income restrictions of owners or tenants. To the extent practicable, grants or loans must be made available statewide. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Homeownership Education, Counseling, and Training new text end new text begin 857,000 new text end new text begin 857,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is for the homeownership education, counseling, and training program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.209. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Capacity Building Grants new text end new text begin 645,000 new text end new text begin 645,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is for capacity building grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.21, subdivision 3b. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Build Wealth MN new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is for a grant to Build Wealth Minnesota to provide a family stabilization plan program including program outreach, financial literacy education, and budget and debt counseling. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Greater Minnesota Housing Infrastructure Grants new text end new text begin 20,000,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin This appropriation is for the greater Minnesota housing infrastructure grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.395. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Statewide Tenant Education and Hotline Service new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin This appropriation is for a statewide tenant education and hotline service that provides free and confidential legal advice for all Minnesota renters. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Accessible Housing Task Force new text end new text begin 150,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin This appropriation is for administration of the Accessible Housing Task Force established in this act. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Policies to Stabilize Affordable Housing new text end new text begin 100,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin This appropriation is for administration of article 3, sections 1, 2, and 6. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Availability new text end new text begin Money appropriated in the first year in this article is available the second year. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin TRANSFER; HOUSING SUPPORT ACCOUNT.new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must transfer any unencumbered balance from the housing support account, under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.43, to the general fund by June 15, 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16A.287, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.43, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Paragraph (a) is effective June 30, 2025. new text end ARTICLE 2 BONDING AUTHORITY AND DEBT SERVICE APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.37, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2k. new text end new text begin Additional authorization. new text end new text begin In addition to the amount authorized in subdivisions 2 to 2j and 3a, the agency may issue up to $100,000,000 in one or more series to which the payments under this section may be pledged. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.37, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Additional appropriation. (a) The agency must certify annually to the commissioner of management and budget the actual amount of annual debt service on each series of bonds issued under this section. (b) Each July 15, beginning in 2015 and through 2037, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2a, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a), not to exceed $6,400,000 annually. The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (c) Each July 15, beginning in 2017 and through 2038, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2b, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a), not to exceed $800,000 annually. The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (d) Each July 15, beginning in 2019 and through 2040, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2c, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a), not to exceed $2,800,000 annually. The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (e) Each July 15, beginning in 2020 and through 2041, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2d, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a). The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (f) Each July 15, beginning in 2020 and through 2041, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2e, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a). The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (g) Each July 15, beginning in 2022 and through 2043, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2f, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a). The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (h) Each July 15, beginning in 2022 and through 2043, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2g, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a). The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (i) Each July 15, beginning in 2023 and through 2044, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2h, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a). The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (j) Each July 15, beginning in 2026 and through 2047, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2j, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a). The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget. (k)new text begin Each July 15, beginning in 2027 and through 2048, if any housing infrastructure bonds issued under subdivision 2k, or housing infrastructure bonds issued to refund those bonds, remain outstanding, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer to the housing infrastructure bond account established under section 462A.21, subdivision 33, the amount certified under paragraph (a). The amounts necessary to make the transfers are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of management and budget.new text end new text begin (l)new text end The agency may pledge to the payment of the housing infrastructure bonds the payments to be made by the state under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 3 HOUSING POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.07, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Report to the legislature. (a) By February 15 each year, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over housing finance and policy containing the following information: (1) the total number of applications for funding; (2) the amount of funding requested; (3) the amounts of funding awarded; and (4) the number of housing units that are affected by funding awards, including the number of: (i) newly constructed owner-occupied units; (ii) renovated owner-occupied units; (iii) newly constructed rental units; and (iv) renovated rental units. (b) This reporting requirement applies to appropriations for competitive development programs made in Laws 2023 and in subsequent laws. new text begin (c) By January 5 each year, the commissioner must report on the financial stability of the affordable housing industry. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the ratio of operating expenses to revenue in affordable rental housing projects; and new text end new text begin (2) the percent of rents collected on time, divided into four regions of the state: new text end new text begin (i) the cities of St. Paul and Minneapolis; new text end new text begin (ii) the metropolitan counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington, except for the cities of St. Paul and Minneapolis; new text end new text begin (iii) urban greater Minnesota, including the cities of Duluth, Mankato, Moorhead, Rochester, and St. Cloud; and new text end new text begin (iv) rural greater Minnesota, which includes all of Minnesota, except for the places listed in items (i), (ii), and (iii). new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Affordable housing annual meeting. new text end new text begin At least once each year, the commissioner must convene a meeting with the Interagency Council to End Homelessness and the cities and counties with high levels of cost-burdened households, meaning those where gross rent or homeownership costs are 30 percent or more of household income. The purpose of the meeting is to discuss: new text end new text begin (1) resources received by cities and counties; new text end new text begin (2) regional needs for affordable housing; and new text end new text begin (3) recommendations for the collaborative use of funds to effectively address homelessness, housing insecurity, security of affordable housing, and the lack of housing supply. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Prioritization of competitive development program awards. new text end new text begin (a) When assessing applications for funding from competitive development programs, the commissioner shall prioritize applications for projects located in jurisdictions that have policies conducive to developing residential properties. For assessing applications for funding for any competitive development program, the commissioner shall develop a scoring system which awards additional points to any jurisdiction that meets any of the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) the jurisdiction allows for the development of multifamily housing in at least 75 percent of the area within the jurisdiction zoned as the commercial district; new text end new text begin (2) the jurisdiction allows for duplexes, accessory dwelling units, or townhomes within 75 percent of the area within the jurisdiction zoned for single-family and applies the same administrative approval process to those properties that would apply to a single-family dwelling being developed on the same lot; new text end new text begin (3) the jurisdiction does not have parking mandates greater than one stall per unit of housing for single family or multifamily developments; new text end new text begin (4) the jurisdiction does not mandate lot sizes larger than one-eighth of an acre; and new text end new text begin (5) the jurisdiction does not place aesthetic mandates on new home construction in single-family, including type of exterior finish materials, including siding; the presence of shutters, columns, gables, decks, balconies, or porches; or minimum garage square footage, size, width, or depth. new text end new text begin (b) In determining whether a jurisdiction has complied with any of the criteria in paragraph (a), the commissioner may rely on representations on the website of a municipality as to their compliance with any of those criteria. new text end Sec. 4. Laws 2023, chapter 37, article 1, section 2, subdivision 20, is amended to read: Subd. 20. Community-Based First-Generation Homebuyers Down Payment Assistance 100,000,000 -0- This appropriation is for a grant to Midwest Minnesota Community Development Corporation (MMCDC) to act as the administrator of the community-based first-generation homebuyers down payment assistance program. The funds shall be available to MMCDC for a three-year period commencing with issuance of the funds to MMCDC. At the expiration of that period, any unused funds shall be remitted to the agency. deleted text begin Any funds recaptured by MMCDC after the expiration of that period shall be remitted to the agency.deleted text end Funds remitted to the agency under this paragraph are appropriated to the agency for administration of the first-generation homebuyers down payment assistance fund. Sec. 5. Laws 2023, chapter 37, article 2, section 9, is amended to read: Sec. 9. COMMUNITY-BASED FIRST-GENERATION HOMEBUYERS ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Establishment. A community-based first-generation homebuyers down payment assistance program is established as a deleted text begin pilot projectdeleted text end new text begin programnew text end under the administration of the Midwest Minnesota Community Development Corporation (MMCDC), a community development financial institution (CDFI) as defined under the Riegle Community Development and Regulatory Improvement Act of 1994, to provide targeted assistance to eligible deleted text begin householdsdeleted text end new text begin homebuyersnew text end . Subd. 2. Eligible deleted text begin householddeleted text end new text begin homebuyernew text end . For purposes of this section, deleted text begin "eligible household"deleted text end new text begin "eligible homebuyer"new text end means deleted text begin a householddeleted text end new text begin an adult personnew text end : (1) whose income is at or below 100 percent of the deleted text begin areadeleted text end new text begin statewidenew text end median income at the time of deleted text begin purchasedeleted text end new text begin applicationnew text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end deleted text begin (2) that includes at least one adult member: deleted text end deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end who is preapproved for a first mortgage loan;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (3)(i)new text end who either never owned a home or who owned a home but lost it due to foreclosure; and deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end whose parent or prior legal guardian either never owned a home or owned a home but lost it due to foreclosure. deleted text begin At least one adult household member meeting the criteria under clause (2)deleted text end new text begin The eligible homebuyernew text end must complete an approved homebuyer education course prior to signing a purchase agreement and, following the purchase of the home, must occupy it as their primary residence. Subd. 3. Use of funds. Assistance under this section is limited to ten percent of the purchase price of a one or two unit home, not to exceed $32,000. new text begin Beginning in fiscal year 2027, the maximum amount of assistance may be increased to up to ten percent of the median home sales price as reported in the previous year's Minnesota Realtors Annual Report on the Minnesota Housing Market. new text end Funds are reserved at the issuance of preapproval. Reservation of funds is not contingent on having an executed purchase agreement. The assistance must be provided in the form of anew text begin no-interestnew text end loan that isnew text begin forgiven over five years,new text end forgivable at a rate of 20 percent per year on the day after the anniversary date of the notenew text begin , with the final 20 percent forgiven on the down payment assistance loan maturity date. There is no monthly pro rata or partial year credit. The loan has no monthly payment and does not accrue interestnew text end . The prorated balance due is repayable if the property converts to nonowner occupancy, is sold, is subjected to an ineligible refinance, is subjected to an unauthorized transfer of title, or is subjected to a completed foreclosure action within the five-year loan term. Recapture can be waived in the event of financial or personal hardship.new text begin MMCDC may retain recaptured funds for assisting eligible homebuyers as provided in this section.new text end Funds may be used for closing costs, down payment, or principal reduction. The eligible household may select any first mortgage lender or broker of their choice, provided that the funds are used in conjunction with a conforming first mortgage loan that is fully amortizing and meets the standards of a qualified mortgage or meets the minimum standards for exemption under Code of Federal Regulations, title 12, section 1026.43. Funds may be used in conjunction with other programs the eligible household may qualify for and the loan placed in any priority position. Subd. 4. Administration. The community-based first-generation homebuyers down payment assistance program is available statewide and shall be administered by MMCDC, the designated central CDFI. MMCDC may originate and service funds and authorize other CDFIs, Tribal entities, and nonprofit organizations administering down payment assistance to reserve, originate, fund, and service funds for eligible deleted text begin householdsdeleted text end new text begin homebuyersnew text end . Administrative costs must not exceed deleted text begin $3,200 per loandeleted text end new text begin ten percent of the fiscal year appropriationnew text end . Subd. 5. Report to legislature. By January 15 each year, the fund administrator, MMCDC, must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over housing finance and policy the following information: (1) the number and amount of loans closed; (2) the median loan amount; (3) the number and amount of loans issued by race or ethnic categories; (4) the median home purchase price; (5) the interest rates and types of mortgages; (6) the credit scores of both applicants and households served; (7) the total amount returned to the fund; and (8) the number and amount of loans issued by county. Sec. 6. new text begin POLICY FRAMEWORK FOR TARGETED STABILIZATION OF REGULATED AFFORDABLE HOUSING.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of housing finance must work with affordable housing stakeholders, including the Interagency Stabilization Group, to develop a policy framework for targeted stabilization of affordable rental housing. In developing this framework, the commissioner must identify: new text end new text begin (1) strategies, tools, and funding mechanisms for targeted stabilization of affordable rental housing and recapitalization of distressed properties; new text end new text begin (2) potential improvements for regulatory relief for affordable rental housing providers and implement these improvements where feasible; new text end new text begin (3) a specific plan for relief when an operator of permanent housing cannot identify and secure adequate service funding that matches the tenants' needs; and new text end new text begin (4) a strategy with the commissioner of human services to integrate the awarding of state service dollars to permanent supportive housing so that state service dollars can accompany capital awards in the consolidated request for proposal process. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must report quarterly to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency Board of Directors on the policy framework, improvements implemented, and any potential changes to legislation that may be needed to support targeted stabilization of regulated affordable housing and recapitalization of distressed properties. new text end new text begin (c) By January 5, 2026, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over housing finance and policy on the policy framework, improvements implemented, and any potential changes to legislation that may be needed to support targeted stabilization of regulated affordable housing and recapitalization of distressed properties. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin ACCESSIBLE HOUSING TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Accessible housing" means housing that is designed, constructed, or modified to enable persons with disabilities to live independently. Accessible housing may be made accessible through design or additional features, such as modified bathrooms, cabinetry, appliances, furniture, space, shelves, or cupboards that improve the overall ability of persons with disabilities to function in the housing. new text end new text begin (c) "Person with a disability" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 256.481. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment of task force. new text end new text begin An Accessible Housing Task Force is established to: new text end new text begin (1) examine the housing experiences of persons with disabilities, including their experiences seeking accessible housing or independent housing; new text end new text begin (2) examine the practices of housing providers related to accessible housing and independent housing and the issues preventing housing providers from providing accessible housing or independent housing units to persons with disabilities; and new text end new text begin (3) recommend legislation to increase the supply of safe and affordable, accessible housing and independent housing units. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following members appointed by the governor: new text end new text begin (1) five persons with disabilities who have experienced a lack of accessible housing; new text end new text begin (2) two parents of adult persons who have experienced a lack of affordable housing; new text end new text begin (3) one representative of the Minnesota Council on Disability; new text end new text begin (4) one representative of Arc Minnesota; new text end new text begin (5) one representative of the Minnesota Consortium for Citizens with Disabilities; new text end new text begin (6) one representative of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency; new text end new text begin (7) one representative of the Minnesota Department of Human Services; new text end new text begin (8) one representative of the Minnesota Department of Health; new text end new text begin (9) one staff person working for a housing stabilization services program; new text end new text begin (10) one representative of a housing contractor who has built accessible housing; new text end new text begin (11) one representative of a housing developer who has developed property that includes accessible housing; new text end new text begin (12) one representative of an organization or a local government agency that helps find housing for people with disabilities; new text end new text begin (13) one member of the Minnesota Board on Aging; and new text end new text begin (14) two representatives of organizations or groups who advocate for persons with disabilities. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments must be made no later than July 1, 2025, and must include representatives of both the metropolitan area and greater Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) Task force members must serve without compensation, except for public members. Members eligible for compensation must receive expenses as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (d) Vacancies must be filled by the governor consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings; officers. new text end new text begin (a) The Minnesota Housing Finance Agency shall convene the first meeting of the task force no later than August 15, 2025, and shall provide accessible physical or virtual meeting space as necessary for the task force to conduct its work. new text end new text begin (b) At its first meeting, the task force shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among the task force members and may elect other officers as necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force shall meet according to a schedule determined by the members or upon the call of the task force's chair. The task force must meet as often as necessary to accomplish the duties under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (d) Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must seek input from: new text end new text begin (1) individuals who are experiencing or who have experienced the lack of affordable, accessible housing; new text end new text begin (2) providers of accessible housing; and new text end new text begin (3) any other persons or organizations with experience or expertise in affordable, accessible housing. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) research and analyze how other states, cities, and counties address a lack of affordable, accessible housing; and new text end new text begin (2) develop recommendations to establish statewide education on affordable, accessible housing to ensure that local units of government include affordable, accessible housing and affordable housing policies in local planning. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin (a) No later than February 1, 2026, the task force shall submit an initial report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over housing on the findings and recommendations of the task force for improving the supply, quality, and affordability of accessible housing statewide. new text end new text begin (b) No later than August 31, 2026, the task force shall submit a final report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over housing on the findings and recommendations in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day following submission of the final report under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: H2445-1 16A.287 TRANSFER; HOUSING SUPPORT. In fiscal year 2025 and each year thereafter, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer $450,000 from the general fund to the housing support account, under section 462A.43. 462A.43 HOUSING SUPPORT ACCOUNT. The commissioner of management and budget shall establish the housing support account in the special revenue fund for the deposit of certain funds provided by law. Money appropriated from the account by law must provide housing support for Minnesotans.